Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-410
Immunities.

(1) A physician or other health care provider shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or discipline for unprofessional conduct for giving effect to a declaration in the absence of knowledge of the revocation of a declaration.

(2) A physician or other health care provider whose action under the Rights of the Terminally Ill Act is in accord with reasonable medical standards shall not be subject to criminal or civil liability, or discipline for unprofessional conduct, with respect to that action.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 10.